South Dakota, session 2026, HB1308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. It is the intention of the Legislature that the proceeds of the tax rate increases in
sections 3 to 18, inclusive, and section 24 of this Act, are used for the following purposes:
(1) State aid to replace property tax revenues forgone from a mill levy of zero applied
to owner-occupied single-family dwellings for school district general funds and
school district special education funds; and
(2) Ongoing expenditures for the payroll and rate increases of state employees, school
employees, and medicaid providers.
It is the intention of the Legislature that these levies for owner-occupied single-
family dwellings do not affect the maximum mill levies for the other classifications of real
property, and do not adversely affect the total amount of moneys available to school
districts through the school district funding formulas for general funds and special
education funds.
Section 2. That § 10-12-42 be AMENDED:
10-12-42. For taxes payable in 2026 2027, and each year thereafter, the
maximum levy for the general fund of a school district is as follows:
(1) The maximum tax mill levy is five dollars and twenty-one and one-tenth cents per
thousand dollars of taxable valuation, subject to the limitations on agricultural
property as provided in subdivision (2) of this section and owner-occupied property
as provided in subdivision (3) of this section;
(2) The maximum tax mill levy on agricultural property for the school district is one
dollar and twelve and five-tenths cents per thousand dollars of taxable valuation.
If the district's levies are less than the maximum mill levies as stated in this section,
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.815.27 2 1308
the mill levies imposed in subdivision (1) and this subdivision must maintain the
same proportion to each other as represented in the mathematical relationship at
the maximum mill levies; and
(3) The maximum tax mill levy for an owner-occupied single-family dwelling pursuant
to § 10-13-40 for the school district is two zero dollars and fifty-one and eight-
tenths zero cents per thousand dollars of taxable valuation. If the district's levies
are less than the maximum levies as stated in this section, the levies must maintain
the same proportion to each other as represented in the mathematical relationship
at the maximum levies.
All levies in this section must be imposed on valuations where the median level of
assessment represents eighty-five percent of market value as determined by the
Department of Revenue. These valuations must be used for all school funding purposes.
If the district has imposed an excess levy pursuant to § 10-12-43, the three mill
levies must maintain the same proportion to each other as represented in the
mathematical relationship at the maximum levies in of this section for taxes payable in
2026. The school district may elect to tax at less than the maximum amounts set forth in
this section.
Section 3. That § 10-45-2 be AMENDED:
10-45-2. There is hereby imposed a tax upon the privilege of engaging in business
as a retailer, a tax of four and two-tenths percent upon the gross receipts of all sales of
tangible personal property consisting of goods, wares, or merchandise, except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, sold at retail in the state to consumers or users, at the
following tax rate:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2026, until June 30, 2027, four and seven-tenths percent; and
(2) Beginning July 1, 2027, five percent.
Section 4. That § 10-45-5 be AMENDED:
10-45-5. There is imposed a tax, at the rate of four and two-tenths percent set
forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts of any person from engaging or continuing in
any of the following businesses or services in this state: abstracters
(1) Abstracters;
(2) accountantsAccountants;
(3) ancillaryAncillary services;
(4) architectsArchitects;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.815.27 3 1308
(5) barbersBarbers;
(6) beautyBeauty shops;
(7) billBill collection services;
(8) blacksmithBlacksmith shops;
(9) carCar washing;
(10) dryDry cleaning;
(11) dyeingDyeing;
(12) exterminatorsExterminators;
(13) garageGarage and service stations;
(14) garmentGarment alteration;
(15) cleaningCleaning and pressing;
(16) janitorialJanitorial services and supplies;
(17) specialtySpecialty cleaners;
(18) laundryLaundry;
(19) linenLinen and towel supply;
(20) membershipMembership or entrance fees for the use of a facility or for the
right to purchase tangible personal property, any product transferred electronically, or
services;
(21) photographyPhotography;
(22) photoPhoto developing and enlarging;
(23) tireTire recapping;
(24) weldingWelding and all repair services, except repair services for farm
machinery, attachment units, and irrigation equipment used exclusively for agricultural
purposes;
(25) cableCable television; and
(26) rentalsRentals of tangible personal property, except leases of tangible
personal property between one telephone company and another telephone company,
motor vehicles as defined pursuant to § 32-5-1 leased under a single contract for more
than twenty-eight days, and mobile homes. However, the
The specific enumeration of businesses and professions made in this section does
not, in any way, limit the scope and effect of the provisions of § 10-45-4.
Section 5. That § 10-45-5.3 be AMENDED:
10-45-5.3. There is imposed, at the rate of four and two-tenths percent set forth
in § 10-45-2, an excise tax on the gross receipts of any person engaging in oil and gas
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.815.27 4 1308
field services (, group no. 138), as enumerated in the Standard Industrial Classification
Manual, 1987, as prepared by the Statistical Policy Division of the Office of Management
and Budget, Office of the President.
Section 6. That § 10-45-6 be AMENDED:
10-45-6. There is hereby imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent, at the
rate set forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts from sales, furnishing, or service of
gas, electricity, and water, including the gross receipts from such the sales by any
municipal corporation furnishing gas, and electricity, to the public in its proprietary
capacity, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, when sold at retail in the State of
South Dakota this state to consumers or users.
Section 7. That § 10-45-6.1 be AMENDED:
10-45-6.1. Except as provided in § 10-45-6.2, there is hereby imposed a tax of
four and two-tenths percent, at the rate set forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts
from providing any intrastate, interstate, or international telecommunications service that
originates or terminates in this state and that is billed or charged to a service address in
this state, or that both originates and terminates in this state. However, the tax imposed
by this section does not apply to:
(1) Any eight hundred or eight hundred-type service, unless the service both originates
and terminates in this state;
(2) Any sale of a telecommunication service to a provider of telecommunication
services, including access service, for use in providing any telecommunication
service; or
(3) Any sale of interstate telecommunication service provided to a call center that has
been certified by the secretary of revenue to meet the criterion established in § 10-
45-6.3 and the call center has provided to the telecommunications service provider
an exemption certificate issued by the secretary indicating that it meets the
criterion.
If a call center uses an exemption certificate to purchase services not meeting the
criterion established in § 10-45-6.3, the call center is liable for the applicable tax, penalty,
and interest.
Section 8. That § 10-45-6.2 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.815.27 5 1308
10-45-6.2. There is hereby imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent, at the
rate set forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts of mobile telecommunications services,
as defined in 4 U.S.C. § 124(7) as of (January 1, 2002), that originate and terminate in
the same state and are billed to a customer with a place of primary use in this state or
are deemed to have originated or been received in this state and to be billed or charged
to a service address in this state if the customer's place of primary use is located in this
state regardless of where the service actually originates or terminates. Notwithstanding
any other provision of this chapter and for purposes of the tax imposed by this section,
the tax imposed upon mobile telecommunication services must be administered in
accordance with 4 U.S.C. §§ 116- to 126, as in effect on, inclusive, (July 28, 2000).
Section 9. That § 10-45-8 be AMENDED:
10-45-8. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there is imposed a tax of
four and two-tenths percent, at the rate set forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts
from all sales of tickets or admissions to:
(1) Places of amusement;
(2) Athletic contests; or
(3) Events.
Section 10. That § 10-45-71 be AMENDED:
10-45-71. There is imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent on, at the rate
set forth in § 10-45-2, on the gross receipts from the transportation of passengers. The
tax imposed by this section applies to any transportation of passengers if the passenger
boards and exits the mode of transportation within this state.
Section 11. That § 10-46-2.1 be AMENDED:
10-46-2.1. For the privilege of using services in South Dakota this state, except
those types of services exempted by § 10-46-17.3, there is imposed on the person using
the service an excise tax equal to four and two-tenths percent of on the value of the
services at the time they are rendered, at the following tax rate:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2026, until June 30, 2027, four and seven-tenths percent; and
(2) Beginning July 1, 2027, five percent.
However, this This tax may not be imposed on any service rendered by a related
corporation, as defined in subdivision 10-43-1(11), for use by a financial institution, as
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.815.27 6 1308
defined in subdivision 10-43-1(4) § 10-43-1; or on any service rendered by a financial
institution, as defined in subdivision 10-43-1(4) § 10-43-1, for use by a related
corporation as defined in subdivision 10-43-1(11).
For the purposes of this section, the term, "related corporation," includes a means
a corporation associated with another as its parent or subsidiary, or in a brother-sister
relationship. The term includes a corporation, which together with the financial institution,
is part of a controlled group of corporations, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 1563 as in effect
on (January 1, 1989), except that the eighty percent ownership requirements set forth in
26 U.S.C. § 563(a)(2)(A) § 1563(a) for a brother-sister controlled group are reduced to
fifty-one percent.
For the purpose of this chapter, services rendered by an employee for the use of
the employer are not taxable.
Section 12. That § 10-46-2.2 be AMENDED:
10-46-2.2. An excise tax is imposed upon the privilege of the use of rented
tangible personal property and any product transferred electronically in this state, at the
rate of four and two-tenths percent of set forth in § 10-46-2.1, on the rental payments
upon the property.
Section 13. That § 10-46-58 be AMENDED:
10-46-58. There is imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent on, at the rate
set forth in § 10-46-2.1, upon the privilege of the use of any transportation of passengers.
The tax imposed by this section applies to any transportation of passengers if the
passenger boards and exits the mode of transportation within this state.
Section 14. That § 10-46-69 be AMENDED:
10-46-69. There is hereby imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent, at the
rate set forth in § 10-46-2.1, upon the privilege of the use of mobile telecommunications
services, as defined in 4 U.S.C. § 124(7) as of (January 1, 2002), that originate and
terminate in the same state and are billed to a customer with a place of primary use in
this state. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and for purposes of the tax
imposed by this section, the tax imposed upon mobile telecommunication services must
be administered in accordance with 4 U.S.C. §§ 116-126, as in effect on (July 28, 2000).
Section 15. That § 10-46-69.1 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.815.27 7 1308
10-46-69.1. Except as provided in § 10-46-69, there is hereby imposed a tax of
four and two-tenths percent, at the rate set forth in § 10-46-2.1, upon the privilege of the
use of any intrastate, interstate, or international telecommunications service that
originates or terminates in this state and that is billed or charged to a service address in
this state, or that both originates and terminates in this state. However, the The tax
imposed by this section does not apply to:
(1) Any eight hundred or eight hundred type service unless the service both originates
and terminates in this state;
(2) Any sale of a telecommunication service to a provider of telecommunication
services, including access service, for use in providing any telecommunication
service; or
(3) Any sale of interstate telecommunication service provided to a call center that has
been certified by the secretary of revenue to meet the criterion established in § 10-
45-6.3 and the call center has provided to the telecommunications service provider
an exemption certificate issued by the secretary indicating that it meets the
criterion.
If a call center uses an exemption certificate to purchase services not meeting the
criterion established in § 10-45-6.3, the call center is liable for the applicable tax, penalty,
and interest.
Section 16. That § 10-46-69.2 be AMENDED:
10-46-69.2. There is hereby imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent, at the
rate set forth in § 10-46-2.1, upon the privilege of the use of any ancillary services.
Section 17. That § 10-46E-1 be AMENDED:
10-46E-1. There is hereby imposed an excise tax of four and two-tenths percent
on the gross receipts from the sale, resale, or lease of farm machinery, attachment units,
and irrigation equipment used exclusively for agricultural purposes, at the following tax
rate:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2026, until June 30, 2027, four and seven-tenths percent; and
(2) Beginning July 1, 2027, five percent.
However, if If any trade-in or exchange of used farm machinery, attachment units,
and irrigation equipment is involved in the transaction, the excise tax is only due and may
only be collected on the cash difference.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.815.27 8 1308
Section 18. That § 10-58-1 be AMENDED:
10-58-1. There is imposed upon owners and operators a special amusement
excise tax of four and two-tenths percent of on the gross receipts from the sale or the
operation of any mechanical or electronic amusement device, at the following tax rate:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2026, until June 30, 2027, four and seven-tenths percent; and
(2) Beginning July 1, 2027, five percent.
The tax imposed by this section is in lieu of the tax imposed pursuant to chapter
10-45.
Section 19. That § 13-13-71 be AMENDED:
13-13-71. If local effort increases on a statewide aggregate basis by a greater
percentage than local need on a statewide aggregate basis from any one year to the next,
for the following year each of the mill levies specified in subdivision 13-13-10.1(13) shall
subdivisions 10-12-42(1) and (2) must be reduced proportionally so that the percentage
increase in local effort on a statewide aggregate basis equals the percentage increase in
need on a statewide aggregate basis.
Section 20. That § 13-13-72 be AMENDED:
13-13-72. It is the policy of the Legislature that In 2028 and each year thereafter,
the appropriation for state aid to education must increase on an annual basis by the
percentage increase in local need on an aggregate statewide basis so that the relative
proportion of local need paid by local effort and state aid shall remain remains constant.For
school fiscal years 2017 to 2022, inclusive, the proportion of local need paid by local effort
and state aid shall be adjusted annually to maintain the proportion between state aid and
local property taxes and to reflect adjustments in local effort due to the implementation
of the other revenue base amount as defined in § 13-13-10.1.
Section 21. That § 13-13-72.1 be AMENDED:
13-13-72.1. Any adjustments In 2028 and each year thereafter, any adjustment
in the levies specified in § 10-12-42 made pursuant to §§ 13-13-71 and § 13-13-72 shall
be based on maintaining must maintain the relationship between statewide local effort as
a percentage of statewide local need in the fiscal year succeeding the fiscal year in which
the adjustment is made. For school fiscal years 2017 to 2022, inclusive, the proportion of
local need paid by local effort and state aid shall be adjusted annually to reflect
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.815.27 9 1308
adjustments in local effort due to the implementation of the other revenue base amount
as defined in § 13-13-10.1. However, if If the levies specified in § 10-12-42 are not
adjusted to maintain this relationship, the target teacher salary as defined in § 13-13-
10.1 shall be, must be reduced to maintain the relationship between for statewide local
effort as a percentage of statewide local need.
Section 22. That § 13-37-16 be AMENDED:
13-37-16. For taxes payable in 2026 2027, and each year thereafter, the school
board shall may levy no more than one dollar and forty-six and two-tenths cents per
thousand dollars of taxable valuation of property classified for purposes of taxation as
agricultural property and nonagricultural property, as a special levy in addition to all other
levies authorized by law for the amount so determined to be necessary, and the levy must
be spread against all of the taxable property of the district not classified as owner-occupied
single-family dwellings, as defined in § 10-13-39. The proceeds derived from the levy
constitute a school district special education fund of the district for the payment of costs
for the special education of all children in need of special education or special education
and related services, who reside within the district, pursuant to the provisions of §§ 13-
37-8.4 to 13-37-8.10, inclusive.
The levy in this section is based on valuations where the median level of
assessment represents eighty-five percent of market value as determined by the
Department of Revenue. The total amount of taxes that would be generated at the levy
pursuant to this section is considered local effort. Money in the special education fund may
be expended for the purchase or lease of any assistive technology that is directly related
to special education and specified in a student's individualized education plan. This section
does not apply to real property improvements.
Section 23. That § 13-37-16.2 be AMENDED:
13-37-16.2. If In 2028 and each year thereafter, if local effort increases on a
statewide aggregate basis by a greater percentage than local need on a statewide
aggregate basis from any one year to the next, for the following year, the levy specified
in subdivision 13-37-35.1(7) shall must be reduced proportionally so that the percentage
increase in local effort on a statewide aggregate basis equals the percentage increase in
need on a statewide aggregate basis.
Section 24. That § 13-37-16.3 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.815.27 10 1308
13-37-16.3. Any In 2028 and each year thereafter, any adjustments in the levy
specified in subdivision 13-37-35.1(7) made pursuant to § 13-37-16.2 shall must be
based on maintaining the relationship between statewide local effort as a percentage of
statewide local need in the fiscal year succeeding the fiscal year in which the adjustment
is made. However, for fiscal year 2014, and
In 2028 and each year thereafter, if the levy specified in subdivision 13-37-35.1(7)
is not adjusted to maintain this relationship, the funding allocation for each disability level
as defined in § 13-37-35.1 shall must be reduced proportionally to maintain the
relationship between statewide local effort as a percentage of statewide local need.
Section 25. That § 13-37-35.1 be AMENDED:
13-37-35.1. Terms used in chapter 13-37 mean:
(1) "Level one disability," a mild disability;
(2) "Level two disability," cognitive disability or emotional disorder;
(3) "Level three disability," hearing impairment, deafness, visual impairment, deaf-
blindness, orthopedic impairment, or traumatic brain injury;
(4) "Level four disability," autism;
(5) "Level five disability," multiple disabilities;
(5A) "Level six disability," prolonged assistance;
(6) "Index factor," is the annual percentage change in the consumer price index for
urban wage earners and clerical workers as computed by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the year before the year
immediately preceding the year of adjustment, or three percent, whichever is less;
(7) "Local effort," must be an amount calculated for taxes payable in 2026 2027 and
thereafter using a the maximum special education levy of one dollar and twenty-
six and two-tenths cents per one thousand dollars of valuation set forth in § 13-
37-16, imposed on the taxable valuation of property classified for purposes of
taxation as agricultural property and nonagricultural property;
(8) "Allocation for a student with a level one disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $7,650.45. For each school year thereafter, the allocation
for a student with a level one disability must be the previous fiscal year's allocation
for the child increased by the index factor;
(9) "Allocation for a student with a level two disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $16,759.91. For each school year thereafter, the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.815.27 11 1308
allocation for a student with a level two disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(10) "Allocation for a student with a level three disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $23,139.68. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level three disability must be the previous fiscal
year's allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(11) "Allocation for a student with a level four disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $18,053.89. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level four disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(12) "Allocation for a student with a level five disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $37,039.28. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level five disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(12A) "Allocation for a student with a level six disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $11,838.15. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level six disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(13) "Child count," is the number of students in need of special education or special
education and related services according to criteria set forth in rules promulgated
pursuant to §§ 13-37-1.1 and 13-37-46 submitted to the Department of Education;
(14) "Fall enrollment," the number of kindergarten-through-twelfth-grade students
enrolled in all schools operated by the school district on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year minus the number of students for whom
the district receives tuition, except any nonresident student who is in the care and
custody of a state agency and is attending a public school and any student for
whom tuition is being paid pursuant to § 13-28-42.1, plus the number of students
for whom the district pays tuition;
(15) "Nonpublic school," a sectarian organization or entity accredited by the secretary of
education for the purpose of instructing children of compulsory school age. This
definition excludes any school that receives a majority of its revenues from public
funds;
(16) "Nonpublic fall enrollment," the number of children under age eighteen, who are
approved for alternative instruction pursuant to § 13-27-3 on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year plus:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.815.27 12 1308
(a) For nonpublic schools located within the boundaries of a public school
district with a fall enrollment of six hundred or more on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year, the number of kindergarten-
through-twelfth-grade students enrolled on the last Friday of September of
the previous regular school year in all nonpublic schools located within the
boundaries of the public school district;
(b) For nonpublic schools located within the boundaries of a public school
district with a fall enrollment of less than six hundred on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year, the number of resident
kindergarten-through-twelfth-grade students enrolled on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year in all nonpublic schools located
within this state;
(17) "Special education fall enrollment," fall enrollment plus nonpublic fall enrollment;
(18) "Local need," an amount to be determined as follows:
(a) Multiply the special education fall enrollment by 0.1062 and multiply the
result by the allocation for a student with a level one disability;
(b) Multiply the number of students having a level two disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level two disability;
(c) Multiply the number of students having a level three disability as reported
on the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level three disability;
(d) Multiply the number of students having a level four disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level four disability;
(e) Multiply the number of students having a level five disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level five disability;
(f) Multiply the number of students having a level six disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level six disability;
(g) When calculating local need at the statewide level, include the amount set
aside for extraordinary expenses defined in § 13-37-40;
(h) When calculating local need at the statewide level, include the amount set
aside for the South Dakota School for the Blind and Visually Impaired; and
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.815.27 13 1308
(i) Sum the results of subdivisions (18)(a) to (h), inclusive; and
(19) "Effort factor," the school district's special education tax levy in dollars per thousand
divided by $1.262. The maximum effort factor is 1.0.
Section 26. That § 32-5B-20 be AMENDED:
32-5B-20. There is hereby imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent upon on
the gross receipts of any person renting a rental vehicle as defined in § 32-5B-19, at the
following tax rate:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2026, until June 30, 2027, four and seven-tenths percent; and
(2) Beginning July 1, 2027, five percent.
This The tax applies to all vehicles registered in accordance with § 32-5-6, 32-5-
8.1, or 32-5-9. Any rental vehicle not licensed in accordance with § 32-5-6, 32-5-8.1, or
32-5-9 is subject to the motor vehicle excise tax in § 32-5B-1.
The tax imposed by this section is in addition to any tax levied pursuant to chapter
10-45 or 10-46 upon the rental of a rental vehicle. The provisions of chapter 10-45 apply
to the administration and enforcement of the tax imposed by this section.
The tax imposed by this section is in lieu of the tax levied by § 32-5B-1 on the
sales of such motor vehicles. A violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.
Section 27. That 2023 Session Laws, chapter 32, § 19 be REPEALED:
Section 28. The amendments to the Code sections in sections 1 to 17, inclusive,
of this Act are repealed on June 30, 2027, and those Code sections will revert in word and
substance to that which existed immediately prior to the effective date of this Act.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.